Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-407.02
Policies issued on or after operative date of law; default in premium payment on policy anniversary; cash surrender value.

Any cash surrender value available under the policy in the event of default in a premium payment due on any policy anniversary, whether or not required by section 44-407.01, shall be an amount not less than the excess, if any, of the present value, on such anniversary, of the future guaranteed benefits which would have been provided for by the policy, including any existing paid-up additions, if there had been no default, over the sum of (a) the then present value of the adjusted premiums as defined in sections 44-407.04, 44-407.08, 44-407.09, and 44-407.24, corresponding to premiums which would have fallen due on and after such anniversary, and (b) the amount of any indebtedness to the company on the policy. For any policy issued on or after the operative date of section 44-407.24 as defined therein, which provides supplemental life insurance or annuity benefits at the option of the insured and for an identifiable additional premium by rider or supplemental policy provision, the cash surrender value referred to in the first paragraph of this section shall be an amount not less than the sum of the cash surrender value as defined in such paragraph for an otherwise similar policy issued at the same age without such rider or supplemental policy provision and the cash surrender value as defined in such paragraph for a policy which provides only the benefits otherwise provided by such rider or supplemental policy provision.

For any family policy issued on or after the operative date of section 44-407.24 as defined therein, which defines a primary insured and provides term insurance on the life of the spouse of the primary insured expiring before the spouse's age seventy-one, the cash surrender value referred to in the first paragraph of this section shall be an amount not less than the sum of the cash surrender value as defined in such paragraph for an otherwise similar policy issued at the same age without such term insurance on the life of the spouse and the cash surrender value as defined in such paragraph for a policy which provides only the benefits otherwise provided by such term insurance on the life of the spouse.

Any cash surrender value available within thirty days after any policy anniversary under any policy paid up by completion of all premium payments or any policy continued under any paid-up nonforfeiture benefit, whether or not required by section 44-407.01, shall be an amount not less than the present value, on such anniversary, of the future guaranteed benefits provided for by the policy, including any existing paid-up additions, decreased by any indebtedness to the company on the policy.

Laws 1943, c. 106, § 5(2), p. 364;

R.S.1943, § 44-407.02;

Laws 1959, c. 206, § 1, p. 719;

Laws 1965, c. 262, § 4, p. 736;

Laws 1981, LB 355, § 4.